North Carolina, session 2025, HB489.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 58-3-190 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-3-190. Coverage required for emergency care.
(a) Every insurer shall provide coverage for emergency services to the extent necessary
to screen and to stabilize the person covered under the plan or to transport the covered person to
a medically appropriate location for screening and stabilization and shall not require prior
authorization of the services if a prudent layperson acting reasonably would have believed that
an emergency medical condition existed. Payment of claims for emergency services shall be
based on the retrospective review of the presenting history and symptoms of the covered person.
(b) With respect to emergency services provided by a health care provider who is not
under contract with the insurer, the services shall be covered if:if any of the following criteria are
met:
(1) A prudent layperson acting reasonably would have believed that a delay would
worsen the emergency, oremergency.
(2) The covered person did not seek services from a provider under contract with
the insurer because of circumstances beyond the control of the covered person.
(3) The covered person did not have a choice in the ground ambulance
transportation service provider due to the emergency.
…
(d) Coverage of emergency services shall may be subject to coinsurance, co-payments,
and deductibles applicable under the health benefit plan. An insurer shall not impose cost-sharing
for emergency services provided under this section section, including emergency ambulance
transportation services, that differs from the cost-sharing that would have been imposed if the
physician or provider furnishing the services were a provider contracting with the insurer.
…
(g) As used in this section, the term:The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Covered person. – An individual who is enrolled in a health benefit plan and
entitled to receive the benefits and services covered by that particular health
benefit plan.
(1a) "Emergency Emergency medical condition" means a condition. – A medical
condition manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity,
including, but not limited to, severe pain, or by acute symptoms developing
*H489-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
from a chronic medical condition that would lead a prudent layperson,
possessing an average knowledge of health and medicine, to reasonably
expect the absence of immediate medical attention to result in any of the
following:
a. Placing the health of an individual, or with respect to a pregnant
woman, the health of the woman or her unborn child, in serious
jeopardy.
b. Serious impairment to bodily functions.
c. Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part.
(1b) Emergency medical transportation. – An emergency response, as defined
under 42 C.F.R. § 414.605, and includes all of the following:
a. Transportation to a healthcare facility.
b. Ground ambulance transportation between two healthcare facilities
"interfacility" transportation, when the transportation is being
provided to the covered person because the needed medical care to
treat the covered person's medical condition is not available at the
current healthcare facility.
c. Emergency medical services that resulted with a medical evaluation
being provided to the covered person without the covered person being
transported to an emergency department.
(2) "Emergency services" means health care Emergency services. – Healthcare
items and services furnished or required to screen for or treat an emergency
medical condition until the condition is stabilized, including prehospital care
care, ambulance transportation services, and ancillary services routinely
available to the emergency department.
…
(4b) Out-of-network provider. – A provider that does not contract with the insurer
of the health benefit plan under which a covered person is receiving services
from that provider is enrolled.
(5) "To stabilize" means to Stabilize. – To provide medical care that is appropriate
to prevent a material deterioration of the person's condition, within reasonable
medical probability, in accordance with the HCFA (Health Care Financing
Administration) Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services interpretative
guidelines, policies and regulations pertaining to responsibilities of hospitals
in emergency cases (as cases, as provided under the Emergency Medical
Treatment and Labor Act, section 1867 of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C.S.
1395dd), including medically necessary services and supplies to maintain
stabilization until the person is transferred.42 U.S.C.S. 1395dd.
(h) The minimum allowable reimbursement rate under any health benefit plan for
emergency medical transportation services provided by an ambulance service provider that shall
be paid to an out-of-network ambulance service provider is one hundred percent (100%) of the
rate set or approved, either by contract or in ordinance, by a local governmental entity established
pursuant to G.S. 153A-250 in the jurisdiction in which the ambulance services originated. In the
absence of a rate set or approved by a local governmental entity, the minimum allowable
reimbursement rate under this subsection is the lesser of the following amounts:
(1) Four hundred percent (400%) of the most recent published Medicare rate for
the ambulance service or services by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act for the same services
provided in the same geographic area.
(2) The out-of-network ambulance service provider's billed charges.
Page 2 House Bill 489-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(i) All of the following apply to emergency medical transportation services provided by
an ambulance service provider:
(1) Payment by an insurer that is in compliance with subsection (h) of this section
is considered payment in full by that insurer for the covered services. This
subdivision does not preclude the billing for, or collection of, any copayment,
coinsurance, deductible, and other cost-sharing feature amounts required to be
paid by the covered person.
(2) An insurer shall promptly remit payment for emergency medical
transportation services directly to the ambulance services provider, regardless
of the network status of that provider. An insurer shall not send any payments
for the reimbursement of these services to a covered person.
(3) An insurer shall not impose upon a covered person any cost-sharing
requirement for emergency transportation services that exceeds the lesser of
the following amounts:
a. One hundred dollars ($100.00).
b. Ten percent (10%) of the minimum allowable reimbursement rate
amount required to be paid by the insurer established under subsection
(h) of this section.
(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a self-funded group plan
regulated under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA) from opting into the
provisions of this section."
SECTION 1.(b) Subdivisions (3) and (4) of subsection (g) of G.S. 58-3-190 are
repealed.
SECTION 2. Section 1(a) of this act is effective October 1, 2025, and applies to
insurance contracts issued, renewed, or amended on or after that date and ambulance services
provided on or after that date. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 489-Second Edition Page 3